California, session 20252026, SB1358.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares the following:(a) The State of California is home to complex and diverse populations and it is essential that all residents have meaningful access to state programs, services, and activities regardless of native language, race, color, gender, national origin, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, disability, or immigrant status.(b) An overwhelming majority of the state’s advertising and marketing funds have been concentrated among a small number of vendors, with insufficient transparency regarding whether funds effectively reach ethnic and community outlets.(c) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to expand the reach into underserved communities by ensuring and enhancing the allocation of advertising funds to ethnic and community media outlets. To achieve this, it is the intent of the Legislature that state agencies adopt serious goals, have read access to a database of ethnic and community media partners, and have the necessary tools to utilize their services quickly and efficiently.SEC. 2. Section 65054 of the Government Code is amended to read:65054. For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) (1) “Ethnic media” means any organization that produces news or culturally relevant media that serves ethnic, racial, or cultural communities residing in California, including priority populations, racial and linguistic minorities, immigrant communities, indigenous groups, and other historically underserved and underrepresented groups.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “priority populations” for purposes of this article, mean members of underserved, disadvantaged, and hard-to-reach communities, including, but not limited to, people who are any of the following:(A) Asian American.(B) Black or African American.(C) Immigrants or refugees.(D) Native American or members of Tribal communities.(E) Latinx.(F) LGBTQ+.(G) Limited English proficiency (LEP).(H) Middle Eastern or North African.(I) Native Hawaiian or Pacific Islander.(J) People with disabilities.(K) Religious minorities.(L) Low-income communities.(b) “Ethnic media outlet” means an entity that provides a substantial amount of ethnic media content through broadcast, print, or digital means, including television, radio, or online outlets on a daily, weekly, or other regular interval, and that has continuously produced that content for at least one year.(c) “Community media outlet” means a nonprofit organization, small business, or microbusiness, as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837, in which at least one-half of the content is originally produced community news and cultural content of specific interest to a community, city, neighborhood, or region in the state through broadcast, print, or digital means, including television, radio, or online outlets on a daily, weekly, or other regular interval, and that has continuously produced that content for at least one year.(d) “Office” means the Office of Community Partnerships and Strategic Communications.(e) “State agency” means each entity identified in Section 11000, and includes the California State University.SEC. 3. Section 65054.3 of the Government Code is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 65054.3 is added to the Government Code, to read:65054.3. (a) The office shall establish and maintain a database of ethnic and community media outlets. The office shall publish guidelines setting forth a process for outlets to apply to be listed and certified within this database pursuant to the criteria set forth in Section 65054.(b) In support of database development, the office may engage nonprofit news outlets and organizations to assist in strengthening the sector and ensuring diverse and wide representation across the state.(c) The office may hold one or more annual trainings for public information and communications officers and other state employees responsible for purchasing advertising to ensure a common understanding of the diverse media ecosystem and best practices for equitable outreach.SEC. 5.Section 2783 of the Labor Code is amended to read:2783.Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the following occupations as defined in the paragraphs below, and instead, the determination of employee or independent contractor status for individuals in those occupations shall be governed by Borello:(a)A person or organization that is licensed by the Department of Insurance pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1760), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1831) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code or a person who provides underwriting inspections, premium audits, risk management, claims adjusting, third-party administration consistent with use of the term “third-party administrator,” as defined in subdivision (cc) of Section 10112.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, or loss control work for the insurance and financial service industries.(b)A physician and surgeon, dentist, podiatrist, psychologist, or veterinarian licensed by the State of California pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, performing professional or medical services provided to or by a health care entity, including an entity organized as a sole proprietorship, partnership, or professional corporation as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code. Nothing in this subdivision shall circumvent, undermine, or restrict the rights under federal law to organize and collectively bargain.(c)An individual who holds an active license from the State of California and is practicing one of the following recognized professions: lawyer, architect, landscape architect, engineer, private investigator, or accountant.(d)A securities broker-dealer or investment adviser or their agents and representatives that are either of the following:(1)Registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.(2)Licensed by the State of California under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25210) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25230) of Division 1 of Part 3 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.(e)A direct sales salesperson as described in Section 650 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, so long as the conditions for exclusion from employment under that section are met.(f)A manufactured housing salesperson, subject to all obligations under Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, including all regulations promulgated by the Department of Housing and Community Development relating to manufactured home salespersons and all other obligations of manufactured housing salespersons to members of the public. The statutorily imposed duties of a manufactured housing dealer under Section 18060.5 of the Health and Safety Code are not factors to be considered under the Borello test.(g)A commercial fisher working on an American vessel.(1)For the purposes of this subdivision:(A)“American vessel” has the same meaning as defined in Section 125.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.(B)“Commercial fisher” means a person who has a valid, unrevoked commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7850) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code.(C)“Working on an American vessel” means the taking or the attempt to take fish, shellfish, or other fishery resources of the state by any means, and includes each individual aboard an American vessel operated for fishing purposes who participates directly or indirectly in the taking of these raw fishery products, including maintaining the vessel or equipment used aboard the vessel. However, “working on an American vessel” does not apply to anyone aboard a licensed commercial fishing vessel as a visitor or guest who does not directly or indirectly participate in the taking.(2)For the purposes of this subdivision, a commercial fisher working on an American vessel is eligible for unemployment insurance benefits if they meet the definition of “employment” in Section 609 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and are otherwise eligible for those benefits pursuant to the provisions of the Unemployment Insurance Code.(3)(A)Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before March 1, 2021, and each June 30 thereafter, the Employment Development Department shall issue an annual report to the Legislature on the use of unemployment insurance in the commercial fishing industry. This report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(i)Reporting the number of commercial fishers who apply for unemployment insurance benefits.(ii)The number of commercial fishers who have their claims disputed.(iii)The number of commercial fishers who have their claims denied.(iv)The number of commercial fishers who receive unemployment insurance benefits.(B)The report required by this subparagraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(4)This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2031, unless extended by the Legislature.(h)(1)A newspaper distributor working under contract with a newspaper publisher, as defined in paragraph (2), or a newspaper carrier.(2)For purposes of this subdivision:(A)“Newspaper” means a newspaper of general circulation, as defined in Section 6000 or 6008 of the Government Code, and any other publication circulated to the community in general as an extension of or substitute for that newspaper’s own publication, whether that publication be designated a “shoppers’ guide,” as a zoned edition, or otherwise. “Newspaper” may also be a publication that is published in print and that may be posted in a digital format, and distributed periodically at daily, weekly, or other short intervals, for the dissemination of news of a general or local character and of a general or local interest.(B)“Publisher” means the natural or corporate person that manages the newspaper’s business operations, including circulation.(C)“Newspaper distributor” means a person or entity that contracts with a publisher to distribute newspapers to the community.(D)“Newspaper carrier” means a person who effects physical delivery of the newspaper to the customer or reader, who is not working as an app-based driver, as defined in Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 7448) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, during the time when the newspaper carrier is performing the newspaper delivery services.(3)(A)On or before March 1, 2025, March 1, 2026, March 1, 2027, March 1, 2028, and March 1, 2029, every newspaper publisher or distributor that hires or directly contracts with newspaper carriers shall submit to the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, in a manner prescribed by the agency and in conformity with existing law, the following information related to their workforce for the current year:(i)The number of carriers for which the publisher or distributor paid payroll taxes in the previous year and the number of carriers for which the publisher or distributor did not pay payroll taxes in the previous year.(ii)The average wage rate paid to carriers classified as independent contractors and as employees.(iii)The number of carrier wage claims filed, if any, with the Labor Commissioner or in a court of law.(B)For the March 1, 2025, reporting date only, every newspaper publisher and distributor shall also report the number of carrier wage claims filed with the Labor Commissioner or in a court of law for the preceding three years.(C)Information that is submitted shall only be disclosed in accordance with Section 7927.705 of the Government Code, relating to trade secrets or other proprietary business information.(i)An individual who is engaged by an international exchange visitor program that has obtained and maintains full official designation by the United States Department of State under Part 62 (commencing with Section 62.1) of Title 22 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the purpose of conducting, instead of participating in, international and cultural exchange visitor programs and is in full compliance with Part 62 (commencing with Section 62.1) of Title 22 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(j)A competition judge with a specialized skill set or expertise providing services that require the exercise of discretion and independent judgment to an organization for the purposes of determining the outcome or enforcing the rules of a competition. This includes, but is not limited to, an amateur umpire or referee.SEC. 6.SEC. 5. Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 11100) is added to Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, to read: CHAPTER 2.6. Local News Preference in Marketing or Outreach Advertising11100. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Department” means the Department of General Services.(b) “Ethnic and Community Media Database” or “database” means the database established pursuant to Section 65054.3 of the Government Code.(c) “Ethnic and community media outlet” means an ethnic media outlet or a community media outlet as those terms are defined in Section 65054 of the Government Code.(d) “Office” means the Office of Community Partnerships and Strategic Communications.(e) “Priority populations” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 65054 of the Government Code.(f) “State agency” means each entity identified in Section 11000 of the Government Code, and includes the California State University.11101. It is the declared policy of the Legislature that the state should assess and evaluate the effectiveness of its contracts to determine how it can best utilize its media and marketing and communication efforts to reach ethnic, racial, or cultural communities residing in California, including priority populations, racial and linguistic minorities, immigrant communities, indigenous groups, and other historically underserved and underrepresented groups.11102.(a)A state agency shall award a contract for the acquisition of advertising or marketing services that has an estimated value of greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but less than three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) only to a small business, including a microbusiness, a nonprofit organization, or an ethnic or community media outlet.(b)A state agency shall not award a contract for the acquisition of advertising or marketing services that has an estimated value of greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but less than three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) to a small business, including a microbusiness, or a nonprofit organization, unless the agency obtains price quotations from two or more entities included in the Ethnic and Community Media Database.11102. (a) Notwithstanding the advertising, bidding, and protest provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290), and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), a state agency may award a contract for the acquisition of advertising or marketing services that has an estimated an estimated value of greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000), but less than three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000), to an ethnic or community media outlet, as long as the agency obtains price quotations from two or more ethnic or community media outlets.(c)(b) Commencing January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the department may conduct a review of the maximum estimated contract value specified in this section and adjust that value to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index.11103. A state agency issuing a request for proposal for marketing or advertising services that requires outreach to priority populations, as defined in Section 65054 of the Government Code, shall provide an awarded vendor with a copy of the Ethnic and Community Media Database and require the vendor to make every effort to prioritize outlets included in the database in their media buying plan.11104. (a) A state agency shall direct at least 40 percent of its annual advertising spending to ethnic and community media outlets.(b) For each state agency required to have a small business liaison pursuant to Section 11148.5 of the Government Code, the small business liaison shall assist the agency in complying with this section by utilizing the Ethnic and Community Media Database and shall work with local community groups and organizations to identify additional ethnic and community media outlets for inclusion in the database.11105. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the office shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature and publish on its internet website, a report that identifies all of the following:(1) Each state agency that paid for placement of marketing or outreach advertising material pursuant to a contract.(2) The amounts paid by each state agency to each media platform pursuant to a contract, including pursuant to a subcontract if the information is available, to place marketing or outreach advertising material.(3) The recipients of the amounts paid by each state agency to media platforms, including to any subcontractors if the information is available, with which the agency contracted or subcontracted to place marketing or outreach advertising materials.(4) The information required in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, shall be further disaggregated to report information on contracts, including on subcontracts if the information is available, for both of the following:(A) The placement of marketing or outreach advertising material targeting specific ethnic communities, including, but not limited to, priority populations.(B) The placement of marketing or outreach advertising material by ethnic and community media outlets.(5) Recommendations for best practices based on successful state agencies.(b) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.11106. This chapter is not intended to amend any of the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.